Utah statutes.
20A-4-504.   Interfering with count.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person to intentionally ascertain, or attempt to
ascertain, the progress or state of the count before the ballot count is
completed in the voting precinct, or before 8 p.m., whichever is later.
(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a third degree felony.
